Massachusetts, session 194th, H2903.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 96 and 111, the figure “1,200”, each 
time that it appears and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 2,000. 
SECTION 2. Said section 91 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in line 100, the figure “$15,000” and inserting in place thereof the 
following figure:- $150,000.